Hawaii statutes.
§432:1-611 Reimbursement for services of
advanced practice registered nurses. All individual and group hospital and
medical service plan contracts and medical service corporation contracts under
this article shall provide reimbursement for health plan-covered services
provided by advanced practice registered nurses licensed pursuant to chapter
457. [L 1999, c 222, §1; am L 2015, c 35, §48]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next